District of Columbia statutes.
7-2039

Denial of a license.

The Mayor may, subject to the right to a hearing, deny an initial or renewal license to an applicant who fails to establish that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure established by this subchapter and rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 10, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3629.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.